Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.101

Milk wash station license.

A wash station operator must obtain a milk wash station license to conduct the operation under this chapter for all wash stations separate from a milk processing plant. A milk wash station license is not transferable with respect to persons or locations or both. The license, issued by the director upon approval of an application for such license and compliance with the provisions of this chapter, shall contain the license number, name, residence, and place of business, if any, of the licensee.

[ 1994 c 143 s 208.]